Hawaii statutes.
§431:10C-314 Jurisdiction. Any person
may bring suit for breach of any contractual obligation assumed by an insurer
under a policy of insurance containing such mandatory or optional provisions in
any state court of competent jurisdiction. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Case Notes

The first party to choose a forum for resolution of no-fault
dispute binds the other party to that forum unless the circuit court finds that
the parties have entered into a mandatory and binding arbitration agreement.
86 H. 59, 947 P.2d 371.

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next